Washington statutes.
RCW 19.410.010

Pilot program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this purpose, the psilocybin therapy services pilot program is established within, and administered by, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences. No later than January 1, 2025, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences must implement this section.

(2) The pilot program must:

(a) Offer psilocybin therapy services through pathways approved by the federal food and drug administration, to populations including first responders and veterans who are:

(i) 21 years of age or older; and

(ii) Experiencing posttraumatic stress disorder, mood disorders, or substance use disorders;

(b) Offer psilocybin therapy services facilitated by:

(i) An advanced social worker, independent clinical social worker, or mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(ii) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; or

(iii) A psychiatric *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW as defined in RCW 71.05.020;

(c) Ensure psilocybin therapy services are safe, accessible, and affordable;

(d) Require an initial assessment to understand participant goals and expectations, and assess the participant's history for any concerns that require further intervention or information before receiving psilocybin therapy services, and an integration session after receiving psilocybin therapy services; and

(e) Use outreach and engagement strategies to include participants from communities or demographic groups that are more likely to be historically marginalized and less likely to be included in research and clinical trials represented by race, sex, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, age, or geographic location.

[2023 c 364 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

(2) 2023 c 364 ss 1-5, 7, 10, 11, and 13 were vetoed. 2023 c 364 s 13 directed ss 1-5 and 7-11 to be codified in a new chapter in Title 18 RCW, but codification in Title 19 RCW appears to be more appropriate.